Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Chapter 19. Removal of Disability of Minority

§ 93-19-1.
Removal of disability as to real estate.

The chancery court of the county in which a minor resides, or the chancery court of a county in which a resident minor owns real estate in matters pertaining to such real estate, may remove the disability of minority of such minor. In cases of married minors, the residence of the husband shall be the residence of the parties. The chancery court of a county in which a nonresident minor of the State of Mississippi owns real estate or any interest in real estate may remove the disability of minority of such minor as to such real estate, so as to enable said minor to do and perform all acts with reference to such real estate, to sell and convey, to mortgage, to lease, and to make deeds of trust and contracts, including promissory notes, concerning said real estate, or any interest therein which may be owned by such minor, as fully and effectively as if said minor were twenty-one (21) years of age. The jurisdiction thus exercised shall be that of a court of general equity jurisdiction, and all presumptions in favor of that adjudged shall be accorded at all times.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1838; 1892, § 493; 1906, § 543; Hemingway’s 1917, § 300; 1930, § 353; 1942, § 1264; Laws, 1924, ch. 158; Laws, 1952, ch. 253; Laws, 1954, ch. 216; Laws, 1956, ch. 223; Laws, 1958, ch. 272, § 1; Laws, 1962, chs. 282, 283.

§ 93-19-3.
Application; defendants.

The application therefor shall be made in writing by the minor by his next friend, and it shall state the age of such minor and join as defendants his parent or parents then living, or, if neither be living, two of his adult kin within the third degree, computed according to the civil law, and the reasons on which the removal of disability is sought; and, when such petition shall be filed, the clerk shall issue process as in other suits to make such person or persons parties defendants, which shall be executed and returned as in other cases, and shall make publication for nonresident defendants as required by law, and any person so made a party, or any other relative or friend of the minor, may appear and resist the application.

In cases where a minor has been adopted by decree of court, the adoptive parent or parents, or the next of kin of the adoptive parent, or parents, as the case may be, shall be joined as defendants in lieu of the natural parents or the next of kin of the natural parents, as herein provided. Where the custody and control of a minor has been by decree of court awarded to one of the natural parents to the exclusion of the other, it shall be sufficient herein to join as defendant only the parent to whom the custody and control has been awarded.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1839; 1892, § 494; 1906, § 544; Hemingway’s 1917, § 301; 1930, § 354; 1942, § 1265; Laws, 1924, ch. 158; Laws, 1940, ch. 236; Laws, 1946, ch. 196, § 1.

§ 93-19-5.
Application; when defendants are not necessary.

If the parent or parents then living, or, if they both be not living, if any two of his adult kin within the third degree shall unite with the minor and his next friend in his application, or if the minor has no parent then living and no kindred within the prescribed degree whose place of residence is known to him or his next friend, it shall not be necessary to make any person defendant thereto. But the court shall proceed to investigate the merits of such application, and decree thereon as in other cases.

In cases where a minor has been adopted by decree of court, the adoptive parent or parents, or the next of kin of the adoptive parent or parents, as the case may be, may unite with the minor and his next friend in his application in lieu of the natural parents or the next of kin of the natural parents, as herein provided. Where the custody and control of a minor has been by decree of court awarded to one of the natural parents or adopted parents, as the case may be, to the exclusion of the other, it shall be sufficient herein for only the parent to whom the custody and control has been awarded to unite with the minor and his next friend in his application, as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1840; 1892, § 495; 1906, § 545; Hemingway’s 1917, § 302; 1930, § 355; 1942, § 1266; Laws, 1918, ch. 123; Laws, 1940, ch. 236; Laws, 1946, ch. 196, § 2.

§ 93-19-7.
Trial and decree.

When the proper persons have been made parties to the application, the court shall examine it, and the objections to it, if any, and may hear testimony in open court, in reference thereto, and shall make such decree thereon as may be for the best interest of the minor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1841; 1892, § 496; 1906, § 546; Hemingway’s 1917, § 303; 1930, § 356; 1942, § 1267.

§ 93-19-9.
Terms of decree.

The decree may be for the partial removal of the disability of the minor so as to enable him to do some particular act proposed to be done and specified in the decree; or it may be general, and empower him to do all acts in reference to his property, and making contracts, and suing and being sued, and engaging in any profession or avocation, which he could do if he were twenty-one years of age; and the decree made shall distinctly specify to what extent the disability of the minor is removed, and what character of acts he is empowered to perform notwithstanding his minority, and may impose such restrictions and qualifications as the court may adjudge proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1842; 1892, § 497; 1906, § 547; Hemingway’s 1917, § 304; 1930, § 357; 1942, § 1268.

§ 93-19-11.
Married minor not under disability for purpose of action involving marital rights.

A married minor shall not be under the disability of minority for the purpose of bringing or defending a suit for divorce, separate maintenance and support, temporary maintenance or support, custody of children or any other action involving marital rights as between the parties, and any married minor may file or defend such a suit in his own name without the necessity of being represented by a next friend or guardian ad litem, and be considered adult for the purposes of such a suit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1838; 1892, § 493; 1906, § 543; Hemingway’s 1917, § 300; 1930, § 353; 1942, § 1264; Laws, 1924, ch. 158; Laws, 1952, ch. 253; Laws, 1954, ch. 216; Laws, 1956, ch. 223; Laws, 1958, ch. 272, § 1; Laws, 1962, chs. 282, 283.

§ 93-19-13.
Persons eighteen years of age or older competent to contract in matters affecting personal property.

All persons eighteen (18) years of age or older, if not otherwise disqualified, or prohibited by law, shall have the capacity to enter into binding contractual relationships affecting personal property. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any contracts entered into prior to July 1, 1976.

In any legal action founded on a contract entered into by a person eighteen (18) years of age or older, the said person may sue in his own name as an adult and be sued in his own name as an adult and be served with process as an adult.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 406, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 93-19-15.
Age requirements for participation in physiological training.

Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, persons eighteen (18) years of age or older shall be entitled to participate in physiological training.

For the purpose of this section, physiological training means the training of flying personnel, passengers, and crew members, military and civilian, which shall include instruction in one (1) or more of the following areas: altitude chamber flights; rapid decompression chamber flights; physiological effects of altitude; human factors in rapid decompression; oxygen equipment; cabin pressurization and decompression; pressure breathing; principles and problems of vision, spatial disorientation and other sensory phenomena; noise and vibration; speed; acceleration; escape from aircraft; emergency procedures; ejection seat and parachute training; and prechamber flight indoctrination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 375, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).